Illinois, session 104th, HB4582.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 522-50 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-50)7    Sec. 22-50. Twice-exceptional students children; 8recommendations.9    (a) As used in this Section, "twice-exceptional student" 10means a student who has the potential for high achievement and 11who is gifted, talented, or accelerated, would benefit from 12advanced academic programs, as defined in Section 14A-17 of 13this Code, and is eligible for an individualized education 14program (IEP) or for a Section 504 plan under Section 504 of 15the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as defined by federal 16or State eligibility criteria.17    (b) The State Advisory Council on the Education of 18Children with Disabilities and the Advisory Council on the 19Education of Gifted and Talented Children shall research and 20discuss best practices for addressing the needs of 21twice-exceptional students "twice-exceptional" children, 22those who are gifted and talented and have a disability. The 23Councils shall then jointly make recommendations to the State   HB4582- 2 -LRB104 17871 LNS 31307 b1Board of Education with respect to the State Board of 2Education providing guidance and technical assistance to 3school districts in furthering improved educational outcomes 4for gifted and twice-exceptional students children. 5Recommendations shall include strategies to (i) educate 6teachers and other providers about the unique needs of this 7population, (ii) train teachers in target, research-based, 8identification and pedagogical methods, and (iii) establish 9guidelines for unique programming for twice-exceptional 10students.11    (c) In the development of the IEP or the Section 504 plan 12for a twice-exceptional student, if the student's ability or 13achievement indicates that the student would benefit from 14advanced academic programs as defined in Section 14A-17 of 15this Code, then those abilities or achievement levels shall be 16recognized and addressed in the student's IEP or Section 504 17plan and be reflected in the individualized services, goals, 18accommodations, and objectives for the student, while 19continuing to provide appropriate services and support for the 20student's disabilities in all educational settings.21    (d) Services, goals, objectives, accommodations, and best 22practices for identifying and addressing the educational and 23related needs of a twice-exceptional student may include, but 24are not limited to:25        (1) individualizing services;26        (2) providing appropriate challenges for the student;  HB4582- 3 -LRB104 17871 LNS 31307 b1        (3) focusing on the strengths of the student first;2        (4) encouraging classroom flexible grouping of 3    students;4        (5) allowing flexibility to show mastery;5        (6) grading by learning objective rather than by the 6    execution of directions;7        (7) using a strength-based approach;8        (8) using a multidimensional approach to identify 9    twice-exceptional students;10        (9) using oral questions;11        (10) extending the time for demonstrating knowledge;12        (11) offering assessment procedures that accommodate 13    language and cultural differences; and14        (12) using both formal and informal assessments. 15(Source: P.A. 96-382, eff. 8-13-09; 96-1000, eff. 7-2-10.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.